Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202157-1621
Agreements with government entities and state agencies; contracts authorized.

(1) The commission may enter into agreements with other government entities and state agencies for the purpose of carrying out the objectives of the Nebraska Geologic Storage of Carbon Dioxide Act, including agreements under the Interlocal Cooperation Act when applicable.

(2) The commission may enter into contracts with private persons to assist it in carrying out the objectives of the act.

Laws 2021, LB650, § 21.
August 28, 2021
Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.